Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 14
CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT
PROCEDURES

Cross references:

For support proceedings under the "Colorado Children's Code", see article 6 of title 19; for the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act", see article 5 of this title; for nonsupport, see article 6 of this title; for support proceedings under the "Colorado Child Support Enforcement Act", see article 13 of title 26; for the Colorado child support collection protection act, see article 17 of title 5.

Law reviews:

For article, "The Nuts and Bolts of

C

ollecting Support", see 19

C

olo. Law. 1595 (1990); for article, "Child Support Enforcement Remedies Available Through Child Support Enforcement Agencies", see 33 Colo. Law. 57 (Jan. 2004).

Section

14-14-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Child Support Enforcement Procedures Act".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 905, § 1, effective June 8.

14-14-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 14, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Court" means any court in this state having jurisdiction to determine the liability of persons for the support of another person.

"Delegate child support enforcement unit" means the unit of a county department of human or social services or its contractual agent that is responsible for carrying out the provisions of this article 14. The term "contractual agent" includes a private child support collection agency, operating as an independent contractor with a county department of human or social services, or a district attorney's office, that contracts to provide any services that the delegate child support enforcement unit is required by law to provide.

"Dependent child" means any person who is legally entitled to or the subject of a court order for the provision of proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care, or any other care necessary for his health, guidance, or well-being who is not otherwise emancipated, self-supporting, married, or a member of the armed forces of the United States.

"Duty of support" means a duty of support imposed by law or by order, decree, or judgment of any court, whether interlocutory or final, or whether incidental to an action for divorce, separation, separate maintenance or otherwise. "Duty of support" includes the duty to pay arrearages of support past-due and unpaid.

(4.3) "Employer", for purposes of income withholding pursuant to section 14-5-501, includes any person, company, or corporation, Pinnacol Assurance, or other insurance carrier paying any type of workers' compensation benefits pursuant to articles 40 to 47 of title 8, C.R.S.

(4.5) "Family support registry" means a central registry maintained and operated by the state department of human services pursuant to section 26-13-114, C.R.S., that receives, processes, disburses, and maintains a record of the payment of child support, child support when combined with maintenance, maintenance, child support arrears, or child support debt.

(4.7) "Health insurance" means medical insurance or medical and dental insurance coverage or both of human beings against bodily injury or illness. Such coverage may be provided through a parent's employer or may be acquired individually by the parent.

"Obligee" means any person or agency to whom a duty of support is owed or any person or agency who has commenced a proceeding for the establishment or enforcement of an alleged duty of support.

"Obligor" means any person owing a duty of support, or against whom a proceeding for the establishment or enforcement of a duty of support is commenced.

(6.5) "Plan" means a group health benefit plan or combination of plans, other than public assistance programs, that provides medical care or benefits for a child. "Plan" includes, but is not limited to, a health maintenance organization, self-funded group, state or local government group health plan, church group plan, medical or health service corporation, or other similar plan.

"Public assistance" means assistance payments and social services provided to or on behalf of eligible recipients through programs administered or supervised by the state department of human services, either in cooperation with the federal government or independently without federal aid, pursuant to article 2 of title 26, or by the department of early childhood pursuant to part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5.

"Support order" means any judgment, decree, or order of support in favor of an obligee, whether temporary or final or subject to modification, revocation, or remission, regardless of the kind of action or proceeding in which it is entered.

"Wages" means income to an obligor in any form, including, but not limited to, actual gross income; compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages; earnings from an employer; salaries; payment to an independent contractor for labor or services; commissions; tips declared by the individual for purposes of reporting to the federal internal revenue service or tips imputed to bring the employee's gross earnings to the minimum wage for the number of hours worked, whichever is greater; rents; bonuses; severance pay; retirement benefits and pensions, including, but not limited to, those paid pursuant to articles 51, 54, 54.5, and 54.6 of title 24, and article 30 of title 31; workers' compensation benefits; social security benefits, including social security benefits actually received by a parent as a result of the disability of that parent or as the result of the death of the minor child's stepparent, but not including social security benefits received by a minor child or on behalf of a minor child as a result of the death or disability of a stepparent of the child; disability benefits; dividends; royalties; trust account distributions; any moneys drawn by a self-employed individual for personal use; funds held in or payable from any health, accident, disability, or casualty insurance to the extent that such insurance replaces wages or provides income in lieu of wages; monetary gifts; monetary prizes, excluding lottery winnings not required by the rules of the Colorado lottery commission to be paid only at the lottery office; taxable distributions from general partnerships, limited partnerships, closely held corporations, or limited liability companies; interest; trust income; annuities; payments received from a third party to cover the health-care cost of the child but which payments have not been applied to cover the child's health-care costs; state tax refunds; and capital gains. "Wages", for the purposes of child support enforcement, may also include unemployment compensation benefits, but only subject to the provisions and requirements of section 8-73-102 (5).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 905, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(3) amended, p. 281, § 4, effective April 2.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 651, § 1, effective March 3.

L. 84:

(9) added, p. 480, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(9) amended, p. 596, § 26, effective July 10.

L. 89:

(9) amended, p. 793, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(4.5) added, p. 1414, § 14, effective June 8; (2) and (9) amended, pp. 891, 564, §§ 12, 36, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(9) amended, p. 578, § 6, effective July 1; (4.7) added, p. 169, § 3, effective August 1.

L. 93:

(9) amended, p. 1872, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 94:

(9) amended, p. 1539, § 7, effective May 31; (4.5)(a) and (7) amended, p. 2646, § 109, effective July 1; (9) amended, p. 1253, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4.5) and (9) amended, p. 599, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4.3) added, p. 562, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(9) amended, p. 921, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(9) amended, p. 621, § 16, effective August 4.

L. 2001:

(4.3) amended, p. 721, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(4.3) amended, p. 1892, § 52, effective July 1; (6.5) added, p. 23, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1265, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4.5) amended, p. 387, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 498, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(9) amended, (SB 09-282), ch. 288, p. 1397, § 60, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2018:

IP and (2) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 401, § 16, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(9) amended, HB (20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1045, § 24, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(7) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 829, § 31, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (9) by Senate Bill 94-088 and House Bill 94-1345 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsections (4.5)(a) and (7), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-14-103. Additional remedies.

The remedies provided in this article are in addition to and not in substitution for any other remedies.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 906, § 1, effective June 8.

14-14-104. Recovery for child support debt.

Any payment of public assistance by a county department of human or social services made to or for the benefit of any dependent child or children creates a debt, which is due and owing to the county department of human or social services, recoverable by the county as a debt due to the state by the parent or parents who are responsible for support of the dependent child or children, or by the parent whose rights were terminated pursuant to section 19-5-105.5 and who was ordered to pay child support for the benefit of a dependent child, in an amount to be determined as follows:

Where there has been a court order directed to a parent, the child support debt of that parent is an amount equal to the amount of public assistance paid to the extent of the full amount of arrearages under the order. However, the county department of human or social services, through its delegate child support enforcement unit, may petition for modification of the order on the same grounds as a party to the action.

Where there has been no court or administrative order for child support, the county department of human or social services, through its delegate child support enforcement unit, may initiate a court or administrative action to establish the amount of child support debt accrued, and the court or delegate child support enforcement unit, after hearing or upon stipulation or upon a default order, shall enter an order for child support debt. The debt must be based on the amount of current child support due, or which would have been due if there were an existing order for child support, under the current child support enforcement guidelines in effect on the date of the stipulation, default order, or hearing to establish the child support debt times the number of months the family received public assistance. The total amount of child support debt must not exceed the total amount paid for public assistance. A child support debt established pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) is in addition to any subsequent child support debt accrued pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The county department of human or social services, through its delegate child support enforcement unit, must be subrogated to the right of the dependent child or children or person having legal and physical custody of said child or children or having been allocated decision-making authority with respect to the child or children to pursue any child support action existing under the laws of this state to obtain reimbursement of public assistance expended. If a court enters a judgment for or orders the payment of any amount of child support to be paid by an obligor, the county department of human or social services must be subrogated to the debt created by such judgment or order.

An agreement between any one parent or custodial person or person allocated parental responsibilities and the obligor, either relieving the obligor of any duty of support or responsibility therefor or purporting to settle past, present, or future child support obligations either as settlement or as prepayment, must not act to reduce or terminate any rights of the county department of human or social services to recover from that obligor for any public assistance provided unless the county department of human or social services, through its delegate child support enforcement unit, has consented to the agreement, in writing, and the written consent has been incorporated into and made a part of the agreement.

Any parental rights with respect to custody or decision-making responsibility with respect to a child or parenting time that are granted by a court of competent jurisdiction or are subject to court review must remain unaffected by the establishment or enforcement of a child support debt or obligation by the county department of human or social services or other person pursuant to the provisions of this article 14; and the establishment or enforcement of any such child support debt or obligation must also remain unaffected by such parental rights with respect to custody or decision-making responsibility with respect to a child or parenting time.

No child support debt under this section shall be created in the case of, or at any time collected from, a parent who receives assistance under the Colorado works program as described in part 7 of article 2 of title 26, C.R.S., for the period such parent is receiving such assistance, unless by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Creation of a child support debt pursuant to this section must not modify or extinguish any rights that the county department of human or social services has obtained or may obtain under an assignment of child support rights, including the right to recover and retain unreimbursed public assistance.

When a portion of a public assistance grant, paid to or for the benefit of a dependent child, includes moneys paid to provide the custodial parent or the parent with whom the child resides the majority of the time or caretaker relative with necessities including but not limited to shelter, medical care, clothing, or transportation, then those moneys are deemed to be paid to or for the benefit of the dependent child.

Notwithstanding rule 98 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, venue for an action to establish child support debt is proper in any county where public assistance was or is being paid, in any county where the obligor parent resides, or in any county where the child resides.

A copy of the computer printout obtained from the state department of human services of the record of payments of assistance under the Colorado works program as described in part 7 of article 2 of title 26, C.R.S., made on behalf of a child whose custodian has been receiving child support enforcement services pursuant to section 26-13-106, C.R.S., shall be admissible into evidence as proof of such payments in any proceeding to establish child support debt and shall be prima facie evidence of the amount of child support debt owing on behalf of said child.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 906, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 89:

(1)(b) amended and (8) added, p. 793, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(9) added, p. 891, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(8) amended, p. 253, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1560, § 9, effective June 6; (4) amended, p. 581, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(9) amended, p. 2646, § 110, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(5) and (9) amended, p. 1241, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2), (3), (4), and (7) amended, p. 1401, § 51, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1652, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 2013:

IP(1) amended, (SB 13-227), ch. 353, p. 2062, § 11, effective May 28.

L. 2018:

(1) to (4) and (6) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 401, § 17, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (9), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-14-105. Continuing garnishment.

A writ of garnishment for the collection from earnings of judgments for arrearages for child support, for maintenance when combined with child support, for child support debts, or for maintenance shall be continuing; shall have priority over any garnishment, lien, or income assignment other than a writ previously served on the same garnishee pursuant to this subsection (1) or a wage assignment activated pursuant to section 14-14-107 or section 14-14-111, as those sections existed prior to July 1, 1996, or an income assignment activated pursuant to section 14-14-111.5; and shall require the garnishee to withhold, pursuant to section 13-54-104 (3), C.R.S., the portion of earnings subject to garnishment at each succeeding earnings disbursement interval until such judgment is satisfied or the garnishment is released by the court or in writing by the judgment creditor.

No employer may discharge an employee solely for the reason that his earnings have been subjected to garnishment pursuant to this section. Any such discharge in violation of this subsection (2) shall subject the employer to liability for damages.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 907, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 725, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 591, § 10, effective July 10.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 600, § 10, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning garnishment generally, see article 54.5 of title 13.

14-14-106. Interest.

Interest per annum at four percent greater than the statutory rate set forth in section 5-12-101 on any arrearages and child support debt due and owing before July 1, 2021, may be compounded monthly and may be collected by the judgment creditor; however, such interest may be waived by the judgment creditor and such creditor is not required to maintain interest balance due accounts. After July 1, 2021, interest on child support arrearages and child support debt accrues at the interest rate specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Interest per annum at two percent greater than the statutory rate set forth in section 5-12-101 on any arrearages and child support debt due and owing on and after July 1, 2021, may be compounded annually and may be collected by the judgment creditor; except that such interest may be waived by the judgment creditor and such creditor is not required to maintain interest balance due accounts.

If the judgment creditor seeks interest on child support arrearages as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the debtor obligor may apply to the court to request that the court find good cause to use discretion in disallowing the calculated interest, or a portion thereof, on child support arrearages. In so doing, the court shall consider but is not limited to the following:

Whether good cause existed for the nonpayment of the child support;

Whether payment of the interest would result in undue hardship or substantial injustice for the obligor owing the interest; and

Whether the disallowance or reduction of interest would result in undue hardship and substantial injustice to the person to whom the interest is owed.

The court may determine an equitable period of repayment of any interest and arrears owed, if applicable, as set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 908, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 725, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 633, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1539, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1241, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1266, § 53, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p. 1120, § 3, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the statutory rate of interest, see § 5-12-102.

14-14-107. Wage assignment - applicability. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 908, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 83:

(1)(a) and IP(3) amended and (2) R&RE, pp. 652, 653, §§ 1-3, effective June 1.

L. 84:

(1)(a), IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(III), (2)(a)(IV), (2)(b), and (2)(c) amended and (2)(a)(V) and (3.5) added, pp. 480, 481, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(a), (2)(a) to (2)(c), IP(3), (3)(a)(IV), (3)(c), (3.5), (4)(d), and (9) amended and (1)(d), (1.5), (3.4), (4)(e), and (10) to (13) added, pp.592, 595, §§ 12-15, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1.5)(a), (2)(a)(II), (2)(c), (3)(a)(I), (5), and (7) amended and (1)(e) to (1)(g) and (4)(f) added, pp. 725, 727, §§ 6-8, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section R&RE, p. 580, § 1, effective July 10.

L. 88:

(5)(c)(IX), (5)(c)(XI), IP(7), (7)(d)(IV), and (9)(a) amended, p. 634, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(15) added, p. 810, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 90:

(2)(e), (5)(c)(VIII), (6)(b)(I), (7)(d)(III), (7)(d)(IV), and (7)(g) amended and (6)(b)(III) added, p. 1414, § 15, effective June 8; (15) amended, p. 892, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2)(a), IP(7), (7)(c)(III), (7)(c)(IV), (9), and (11) amended and (7)(d.5) and (7)(d.6) added, p. 203, § 11, effective August 1.

L. 93:

(9) amended, p. 1561, § 10, effective September 1.

L. 94:

(9)(e), amended, p. 1539, § 9, effective May 31; IP(7) amended, p. 2048, § 8, effective June 3; (14) amended, p. 2646, § 111, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 600, § 11, effective July 1.

14-14-108. Child support debt offset. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 654, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 604, § 24, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For present provisions concerning a state income tax refund offset for child support debts or child support arrearages, see § 26-13-111.

14-14-109. Security, bond, or guarantee.

In any action in which child support is ordered, an interested party may apply to the court for an order requiring that the obligor post security, a bond, or other form of guarantee to secure payment of the child support ordered. In considering such request, the court shall consider, among other factors, the nature of the obligor's employment and whether the obligor's income is unreachable by a wage assignment entered pursuant to section 14-14-107 prior to July 1, 1996, or by immediate deduction for a family support obligation pursuant to section 14-14-111 as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, or by an income assignment entered pursuant to section 14-14-111.5 on or after July 1, 1996.

If the request to post security, a bond, or other guarantee is made subsequent to the issuance of a child support order, a copy of the request shall be sent to the obligor at his last-known address by certified mail no later than twenty days prior to the date set for a hearing on the issue. Such notice shall contain a statement of the obligor's rights to appear and contest the request.

When a request to post security, a bond, or other guarantee is before the court, the court shall make findings on the appropriateness of the request based on the evidence presented and shall then either grant or deny the request.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 595, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 622, § 32, effective July 1.

14-14-110. Contempt of court.

Evidence of noncompliance with an order for child support, or maintenance when combined with child support, in the form of an affidavit from the clerk of the court or in the form of a copy of the record of payments certified by the clerk of the court or in the form of a copy of the record of payment maintained by the family support registry is prima facie evidence of contempt of court.

In determining whether or not the obligor is in contempt of court, the court may consider that the required payment has been made prior to the hearing to determine contempt or that owing to physical incapacity or other good cause the obligor was unable to furnish the support, care, and maintenance required by the order for the period of noncompliance alleged in the motion.

If, after personal service of the citation and a copy of the motion and affidavit, the obligor fails to appear at the time so designated, the court may issue a warrant for the obligor's arrest. Upon issuance of the warrant, the court shall direct by endorsement thereon the amount of the bond required.

Pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, where the obligor has been released upon deposit of cash, stocks, or bonds, or upon surety bond secured by property, if the obligor fails to appear in accordance with the primary condition of the bond, the court shall declare a forfeiture. Notice of the order of forfeiture shall be mailed immediately by the court to the obligor and sureties, if any, at the last-known address. If the obligor does not appear and surrender to the court having jurisdiction within thirty days after the date of the forfeiture, or within that period satisfy the court that appearance and surrender by the obligor is impossible and without the obligor's fault, the court shall enter judgment against the obligor and the sureties, if any, for the amount of the bail and costs of the court proceedings.

Any moneys collected or paid upon any such execution or in any case upon said bond shall be turned over to the clerk of the court in which the bond is given to be applied to the child support obligation, including where the obligation is assigned to the department of human services pursuant to section 26-2-111 (3), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 730, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1561, § 11, effective September 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1540, § 10, effective May 31; (5) amended, p. 2647, § 112, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4) amended, p. 562, § 8, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1241, § 40, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (5), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

14-14-111. Immediate deductions for family support obligations - legislative declaration - procedures - applicability. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 805, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 90:

(2)(b)(I), (4)(b)(IV)(B), (4)(b)(IV)(C), (4)(b)(IV)(D), (4)(b)(VII), and (11) amended, p. 1415, § 16, effective June 8; (2)(a) and (4)(b)(IV)(B) amended, p. 892, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2)(b), (2)(c), (4)(b)(III)(C), (6), and (16) amended and (4)(b)(IV.5) and (4)(b)(IV.6) added, p. 207, § 12, effective August 1.

L. 93:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1562, § 12, effective September 1.

L. 94:

(4)(a) amended, p. 2049, § 9, effective June 3.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 600, § 11, effective July 1.